Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201857-921
Commission; price or value of oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances; no power to fix.

Notwithstanding anything heretofore contained in sections 57-901 to 57-921, the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission shall have no authority to establish, fix or in any way control the price or value of oil, gas, other hydrocarbon substances or any of the products or component parts thereof.

Laws 1959, c. 262, § 21, p. 917;

Laws 2016, LB1082, § 15.